Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1916
Recipient; remit award balance; when.

If an award recipient discontinues attendance before the end of the award year, the award recipient shall remit any award balance allowable to the eligible postsecondary educational institution in accordance with such institution's withdrawal policy. The institution shall remit such award balance to the commission in accordance with such institution's refund policy.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 16.